Rhode Island, session 2025, SB24.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings.
(1) As stated in §§ 23-19-3(14) and (16), solid waste incineration releases more than four
hundred (400) toxic pollutants including lead, mercury, dioxins, and acid gasses; poses
unacceptable threats to the health and safety of Rhode Islanders and the environment; and is the
most costly method of waste disposal;
(2) Energy derived from the combustion of solid waste, and from the combustion of fuels
derived from solid waste, is not renewable energy; and
(3) It is in the best interests of the health, safety, and welfare of residents and visitors to
Rhode Island to protect our communities, environment, climate, and natural resources by
prohibiting the construction and operation of solid waste incinerators, waste-to-fuel facilities,
waste-to-chemical facilities, and other high-heat waste facilities.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.19
HIGH HEAT WASTE FACILITY ACT
23-19.19-1. Definitions.
(1) "Construction and demolition (C&D) debris" has the same meaning as set forth in § 23-
18.9-7.
(2) "Depolymerization" means a process through which heat, pressure, and/or solvents are

used to break plastic polymers into oligomers and/or monomers.
(3) "Gasification" means a process through which materials are exposed to heat, converting
carbon-based materials to synthetic fuels, chemical feedstocks, waxes, lubricants, or other
substances and solid residues, slag, ash, char, liquid wastes, and/or wastewater.
(4) "Hazardous waste" has the same meaning as set forth in § 23-19.1-4.
(5) "High-heat waste facility" means a facility which:
(i) Uses any disposal, treatment, recycling, or manufacturing process including, but not
limited to, combustion, incineration, gasification, pyrolysis, hydropyrolysis, solvolysis, or
depolymerization, that exposes solid waste, segregated solid waste, recyclable materials,
construction and demolition (C&D) debris, post-use polymers, or recovered feedstock to
temperatures above four hundred degrees Fahrenheit (400⁰ F); or
(ii) Combusts chemicals, feedstocks, fuels, monomers, oligomers, hydrocarbons, or waste
residues derived from any process that exposes solid waste, segregated solid waste, recyclable
materials, construction and demolition (C&D) debris, post-use polymers, or recovered feedstock to
temperatures above four hundred degrees Fahrenheit (400⁰ F).
(iii) "High-heat waste facility" also includes advanced recycling facilities, chemical
recycling facilities, molecular recycling facilities, and any other facility that uses a thermochemical
process to convert post-use polymers, plastic, or recovered feedstock into fuels, chemical
feedstocks, monomers, oligomers, hydrocarbons, waxes, lubricants, feedstocks, fuels, or
hydrocarbons.
(6) "Hydropyrolysis" means a process through which materials are exposed to heat in the
presence of hydrogen, converting carbon-based materials to synthetic fuels, chemical feedstocks,
waxes, lubricants, or other substances and solid residues, slag, ash, char, liquid wastes, and/or
wastewater.
(7) "Plastic" means a synthetic material made from linking monomers through a chemical
reaction to create a polymer chain, including material derived from either petroleum or a
biologically based polymer, such as corn or other plant sources.
(8) "Post-use polymer" means a plastic polymer previously used in any industrial,
commercial, agricultural, or domestic activity.
(9) "Pyrolysis" means a process through which materials are exposed to heat in the absence
of oxygen, converting carbon-based materials to synthetic fuels, chemical feedstocks, waxes,
lubricants, or other substances and solid residues, slag, ash, char, liquid wastes, and/or wastewater.
(10) "Recovered feedstock" means material derived and separated from solid waste,
segregated solid waste, recyclable materials, or construction and demolition (C&D) debris for use
LC000443 - Page 2 of 4

as a feedstock or raw material in a high-heat waste facility.
(11) "Recyclable materials" has the same meaning as set forth in § 23-18.9-7.
(12) "Segregated solid waste" has the same meaning as set forth in § 23-18.9-7.
(13) "Solid waste" has the same meaning as set forth in § 23-18.9-7.
(14) "Solvolysis" means a process through which materials are combined with a solvent
and subjected to heat and/or high pressure.
23-19.19-2. Prohibition on new high-heat waste facilities.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no permit or license shall
be issued for the construction or operation of a new high-heat waste facility, and no application for
a permit or license for such a facility shall be granted or issued by the state.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000443
========
LC000443 - Page 3 of 4